Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4927.02
Refund claims; interest not allowable.

For all refund claims filed on or after October 1, 1998, interest shall not be allowable on any refunds paid because of benefits earned under the Quality Jobs Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 22.